Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 3. Management of Cooperatives.

§ 55.1-2132.
Organization of the association.

An association must be organized no later than the date the first cooperative interest in the cooperative is conveyed. The membership of the association at all times shall consist exclusively of all the proprietary lessees or, following termination of the cooperative, of all former proprietary lessees entitled to distributions of proceeds under §

55.1-2128

or their heirs, successors, or assigns. The association shall be organized as a stock or nonstock corporation, trust, trustee, unincorporated association, or partnership.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-458; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2133.
Powers of the association.

Except as provided in subsection B, and subject to the provisions of the declaration, the association, even if unincorporated, may:

Adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations;

Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for common expenses from proprietary lessees;

Hire and discharge managing agents and other employees, agents, and independent contractors;

Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two or more proprietary lessees on matters affecting the cooperative;

Make contracts and incur liabilities;

Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements;

Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements;

Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real or personal property, but part of the cooperative may be conveyed, or all or part of the cooperative may be subjected to, a security interest only pursuant to §

55.1-2144

;

Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements;

Impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements, other than limited common elements described in subdivisions 2 and 4 of §

55.1-2113

, and for services provided to proprietary lessees;

Impose charges for late payment of assessments and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, levy fines not to exceed $50 for each instance for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association;

Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the declaration, resale certificates required by §

55.1-2161

, or statements of unpaid assessments;

Provide for the indemnification of its officers and executive board and maintain directors’ and officers’ liability insurance;

Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments, but only to the extent the declaration expressly so provides;

Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or bylaws;

Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in the Commonwealth by legal entities of the same type as the association; and

Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association.

The declaration shall not impose limitations on the power of the association to deal with the declarant that are more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-459; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2133.1.
Installation of solar energy collection devices.

As used in this section, “solar energy collection device” means any device manufactured and sold for the sole purpose of facilitating the collection and beneficial use of solar energy, including passive heating panels or building components and solar photovoltaic apparatus.

No association shall prohibit an owner from installing a solar energy collection device on that owner’s property unless the recorded declaration for the association establishes such a prohibition. However, an association may establish reasonable restrictions concerning the size, place, and manner of placement of such solar energy collection devices on property designated and intended for individual ownership and use. Any resale certificate pursuant to §

55.1-2161

given to a purchaser shall contain a statement setting forth any restriction, limitation, or prohibition on the right of an owner to install or use solar energy collection devices on his property.

A restriction shall be deemed not to be reasonable if application of the restriction to a particular proposal (i) increases the cost of installation of the solar energy collection device by five percent over the projected cost of the initially proposed installation or (ii) reduces the energy production by the solar energy collection device by 10 percent below the projected energy production of the initially proposed installation. The owner shall provide documentation prepared by an independent solar panel design specialist, who is certified by the North American Board of Certified Energy Practitioners and is licensed in Virginia, that is satisfactory to the association to show that the restriction is not reasonable according to the criteria established in this subsection.

The association may prohibit or restrict the installation of solar energy collection devices on the common elements or common area within the real estate development served by the association. An association may establish reasonable restrictions as to the number, size, place, and manner of placement or installation of any solar energy collection device installed on the common elements or common area.

History.

2006, c. 939, §§ 67-700, 67-701; 2008, c. 881; 2009, c. 866; 2013, c. 357; 2014, c. 525; 2020, cc. 272, 795; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 67-700 and 67-701 were rewritten as one section and recodified by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, effective October 1, 2021. The section was placed in the Property Owners’ Association Act
(§

55.1-1820.1

), the Virginia Condominium Act (§

55.1-1951.1

), and the Virginia Real Estate Cooperative Act (this section).

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Solar panels. —

Under § 67-701 as amended, effective July 1, 2014, a property owners’ association may prohibit solar panels on private property only through a recorded declaration but not through any other means. Other than as may be contained in recorded declarations, such prohibitions are unenforceable, regardless of when or how they were imposed.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joseph R. Yost, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, No. 14-057,
(4/14/15).

A property owners’ association retains the authority under § 67-701 to establish reasonable restrictions concerning the size, location, and manner of placement of solar panels on private property, either through a recorded declaration or by any other legal means.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joseph R. Yost, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, No. 14-057,
(4/14/15).

§ 55.1-2134.
Executive board members and officers.

Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, subsection B, or other provisions of this chapter, the executive board may act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the officers and members of the executive board are required to exercise (i) the care required of fiduciaries of the proprietary lessees if appointed by the declarant and (ii) ordinary and reasonable care if elected by the proprietary lessees.

The executive board may not act on behalf of the association to amend the declaration; to terminate the cooperative; to elect members of the executive board, except as provided in the declaration pursuant to subsection F; or to determine the qualifications, powers, and duties or terms of office of executive board members. The executive board may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term.

Within 30 days after adoption of any proposed budget for the cooperative, the executive board shall provide a summary of the budget to all the proprietary lessees and shall set a date for a meeting of the proprietary lessees to consider ratification of the budget. Such meeting shall be held not less than 14 nor more than 30 days after mailing of the summary. The meeting place, date, and time shall be provided with the budget summary. Unless at that meeting a majority of all the proprietary lessees or any larger vote specified in the declaration reject the budget, the budget is ratified, whether or not a quorum is present. In the event the proposed budget is rejected, the periodic budget last ratified by the proprietary lessees shall be continued until such time as the proprietary lessees ratify a subsequent budget proposed by the executive board.

Subject to subsection E, the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by him, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of (i) 60 days after conveyance of 75 percent of the cooperative interests that may be created to proprietary lessees other than a declarant, (ii) two years after all declarants have ceased to offer cooperative interests for sale in the ordinary course of business, or (iii) two years after any development right to add new units was last exercised. A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before termination of that period, but in that event he may require, for the duration of the period of declarant control, that specified actions of the association or executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.

No later than 60 days after conveyance of 25 percent of the cooperative interests that may be created to proprietary lessees other than a declarant, at least one member and at least 25 percent of the members of the executive board must be elected by proprietary lessees other than the declarant. No later than 60 days after conveyance of 50 percent of the cooperative interests that may be created to proprietary lessees other than a declarant, at least one-third of the members of the executive board must be elected by proprietary lessees other than the declarant.

Unless the declaration provides for the selection of one or more independent members of the executive board, no later than the termination of any period of declarant control the proprietary lessees shall elect an executive board of at least three members, at least a majority of whom must be proprietary lessees. To the extent that the declaration so provides, the members of the executive board appointed by the declarant may continue to serve out their terms, and the declarant may continue to appoint a minority of the members of the executive board until all of the development rights reserved by the declarant have been exercised or have expired. In addition, the declaration may provide for the selection of one or more independent members of the executive board, who are neither proprietary lessees nor affiliated directly or indirectly in any way with the declarant, by a vote of two-thirds of the members of the executive board. The executive board shall elect the officers. The executive board members and officers shall take office upon election.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, the proprietary lessees, by a two-thirds vote of all persons entitled to vote at any meeting of the proprietary lessees at which a quorum is present, may remove any member of the executive board with or without cause, other than a member appointed by the declarant.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-460; 2004, c. 242; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2135.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

No special declarant rights created or reserved under this chapter may be transferred except by an instrument evidencing the transfer recorded in every county or city in which any portion of the cooperative is located. The instrument is not effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant is as follows:

A transferor is not relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer and remains liable for warranty obligations imposed upon him by this chapter. Lack of privity does not deprive any proprietary lessee of standing to maintain an action to enforce any obligation of the transferor.

If a successor to any special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant, the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligations or liabilities of the successor relating to the cooperative.

If a transferor retains any special declarant rights, but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor is liable for any obligations or liabilities imposed on a declarant by this chapter or by the declaration relating to the retained special declarant rights and arising after the transfer.

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a security agreement, in case of foreclosure of a security agreement, tax sale, judicial sale, sale by a trustee under a security agreement or sale under receivership proceedings or the Bankruptcy Code as codified in Title 11 of the United States Code, of any cooperative interests owned by a declarant or of real estate in a cooperative subject to development rights:

A person acquiring all the cooperative interests or real estate being foreclosed or sold shall succeed, but only upon his request, to all special declarant rights related to that property held by that declarant or only to any rights reserved in the declaration pursuant to §

55.1-2125

and held by that declarant to maintain models, sales offices, and signs.

The judgment or instrument conveying title shall provide for transfer of only the special declarant rights requested.

Upon foreclosure, tax sale, judicial sale, sale by a trustee under a security agreement, or sale under receivership proceedings or the Bankruptcy Code as codified in Title 11 of the United States Code, of all cooperative interests or real estate in a cooperative owned by a declarant:

The declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights, and

The period of declarant control as provided in subsection D of §

55.1-2134

terminates unless the judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special declarant rights held by that declarant to a successor declarant.

The liabilities and obligations of a person who succeeds to special declarant rights are as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by this chapter or by the declaration.

A successor to any special declarant right, other than a successor described in subdivision 3 or 4, who is not an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed by this chapter or the declaration:

On a declarant that relate to his exercise or non-exercise of special declarant rights; or

On his transferor, other than:

Misrepresentations by any previous declarant;

Warranty obligations on improvements made by any previous declarant or made before the cooperative was created;

Breach of any fiduciary obligation by any previous declarant or his appointees to the executive board; or

Any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer.

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor declarant, other than claims and obligations arising under this chapter or the declaration.

3.

A successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain models, sales offices, and signs pursuant to §

55.1-2125

, if he is not an affiliate of a declarant, may not exercise any other special declarant right and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant, except the obligation to provide a current public offering statement, any liability arising as a result of providing a public offering statement, and obligations under Article 5 (§

55.1-2173

et seq.).

4.

A successor to all special declarant rights held by his transferor who is not an affiliate of that declarant and who succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed or other instrument of conveyance in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying title to cooperative interests or real estate subject to development rights under subsection C may declare his intention in a recorded instrument to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. After declaring such an intention in a recorded instrument, until transferring all special declarant rights to any person acquiring title to any cooperative interest or real estate subject to development rights owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than any right held by his transferor to control the executive board in accordance with the provisions of subsection D of §

55.1-2134

for the duration of any period of declarant control, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor declarant may not exercise special declarant rights under this subsection, he is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability for his acts and omissions under subsection D of §

55.1-2134

.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-461; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2136.
Termination of contracts and leases of declarant.

If entered into before the executive board elected by the proprietary lessees pursuant to subsection F of §

55.1-2134

takes office, (i) any management contract, employment contract, or lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities, (ii) any other contract or lease between the association and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant, or (iii) any contract or lease that is not bona fide or was unconscionable to the proprietary lessees at the time entered into under the circumstances then prevailing may be terminated without penalty by the association at any time after the executive board elected by the proprietary lessees pursuant to subsection F of §

55.1-2134

takes office after giving at least 90 days’ notice to the other party. However, a management contract that is not unconscionable between an association directly or indirectly providing assisted living or nursing services to proprietary lessees and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant may not be terminated while a member of the executive board appointed by the declarant continues to serve unless such termination is approved by a vote of a majority of the members of the executive board and a majority vote of the proprietary lessees, other than the declarant.

This section does not apply to any proprietary lease or any lease the termination of which would terminate the cooperative or reduce its size, unless the real estate subject to that lease was included in the cooperative for the purpose of avoiding the right of the association to terminate a lease under this section. This section does not apply to any contract, incidental to the disposition of a cooperative interest, to provide to a proprietary lessee for the duration of such proprietary lessee’s life, or for any term in excess of one year, nursing services, medical services, other health-related services, board and lodging, and care as necessary, or any combination of such services. The rule of property law known as the rule restricting unreasonable restraints on alienation shall not be applied to defeat any provision of the declaration, bylaws, or proprietary leases requiring that the proprietary lessees be parties to such contracts.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-462; 1985, c. 83; 2004, c. 242; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2137.
Bylaws.

The bylaws of the association shall provide for:

The number of members of the executive board and the titles of the officers of the association;

Election by the executive board of a president, treasurer, secretary, and any other officers of the association the bylaws specify;

The qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office, and manner of electing and removing executive board members and officers and filling vacancies;

Which, if any, of its powers and responsibilities the executive board or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association; and

The method of amending the bylaws.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, the bylaws may provide for any other matters the association deems necessary and appropriate, including a provision for the arbitration of disputes or other means of alternative dispute resolution in accordance with subsection B of §

55.1-2169

.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-463; 1993, c. 849; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2138.
Upkeep of cooperative.

Except to the extent otherwise provided by the declaration, by subsection B, or by subsection G of §

55.1-2145

, the association is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common elements, and each proprietary lessee is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of his unit. Each proprietary lessee shall afford to the association and the other proprietary lessees, and to their agents or employees, access through his unit reasonably necessary for those purposes. If damage is inflicted on the common elements or on any unit through which access is taken, the proprietary lessee responsible for the damage, or the association if it is responsible, is liable for the prompt repair and all costs associated with such repair.

In addition to the liability that a declarant as a proprietary lessee has under this chapter, the declarant alone is liable for all expenses in connection with real estate subject to development rights. No other proprietary lessee and no other portion of the cooperative is subject to a claim for payment of those expenses. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any income or proceeds from real estate subject to development rights inures to the declarant.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-464; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2139.
Common elements; notice of pesticide application.

Associations shall post notification of all pesticide applications in or upon the common elements. Such notice shall consist of conspicuous signs placed in or upon the common elements where the pesticide will be applied at least 48 hours prior to the application.

History.

1999, c. 65, § 55-464.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2139.1.
Electric vehicle charging stations permitted.

Except to the extent that the declaration provides otherwise, no association shall prohibit any proprietary lessee from installing an electric vehicle charging station for the proprietary lessee’s personal use within the boundaries of a unit or limited common element parking space appurtenant to the unit owned by the proprietary lessee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or the declaration, the association may prohibit a proprietary lessee from installing an electric vehicle charging station if installation of the electric vehicle charging station is not technically feasible or practicable due to safety risks, structural issues, or engineering conditions.

The association may require as a condition of approving installation of an electric vehicle charging station that the proprietary lessee:

Provide detailed plans and drawings for installation of an electric vehicle charging station prepared by a licensed and registered electrical contractor or engineer familiar with the installation and core requirements of an electric vehicle charging station.

Comply with applicable building codes or recognized safety standards.

Comply with reasonable architectural standards adopted by the association that govern the dimensions, placement, or external appearance of the electric vehicle charging station.

Pay the costs of installation, maintenance, operation, and use of the electric vehicle charging station.

Indemnify and hold the association harmless from any claim made by a contractor or supplier pursuant to Title 43.

Pay the cost of removal of the electric vehicle charging station if the proprietary lessee decides there is no longer a need for the electric vehicle charging station.

Separately meter, at the proprietary lessee’s sole expense, the utilities associated with such electric vehicle charging station and pay the cost of electricity and other associated utilities.

Engage the services of a licensed electrician or engineer familiar with the installation and core requirements of an electric vehicle charging station to install the electric vehicle charging station.

Obtain and maintain insurance covering claims and defenses of claims related to the installation, maintenance, operation, and use of the electric vehicle charging station and provide a certificate of insurance naming the association as an additional insured on the proprietary lessee’s insurance policy for any claim related to the installation, maintenance, operation, or use of the electric vehicle charging station within 14 days after receiving the association’s approval to install such charging station.

Reimburse the association for any increase in common expenses specifically attributable to the electric vehicle charging station installation, including the actual cost of any increased insurance premium amount, within 14 days’ notice from the association.

The conditions imposed pursuant to this section on a proprietary lessee for installation of an electric vehicle charging station shall run with title to the unit to which the limited common element parking space is appurtenant.

Any proprietary lessee installing an electric vehicle charging station in a unit or on a limited common element parking space appurtenant to the unit owned by the proprietary lessee shall indemnify and hold the association harmless from all liability, including reasonable attorney fees incurred by the association resulting from a claim, arising out of the installation, maintenance, operation, or use of such electric charging station. An association may require the proprietary lessee to obtain and maintain insurance covering claims and defenses of claims related to the installation, maintenance, operation, or use of the electric vehicle charging station and require the association to be included as a named insured on such policy.

History.

2020, c. 1012.

§ 55.1-2140.
Meetings.

A meeting of the association must be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by (i) the president, (ii) a majority of the executive board, or (iii) 20 percent, or any lower percentage if so specified in the bylaws, of the proprietary lessees. No less than 10 or more than 60 days in advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the proprietary lessee. The notice of any meeting shall state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any budget changes, and any proposal to remove a director or officer.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-465; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2141.
Quorums.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast 20 percent of the votes that may be cast for election of the executive board are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the executive board if persons entitled to cast 50 percent of the votes on that board are present at the beginning of the meeting.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-466; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2142.
Voting; proxies.

If only one of the multiple proprietary lessees of a unit is present at a meeting of the association, he is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to the cooperative interest of which that unit is a part. If more than one of the multiple proprietary lessees are present, the votes allocated to that cooperative interest may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the multiple proprietary lessees, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is majority agreement if any one of the multiple proprietary lessees casts the votes allocated to that cooperative interest without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other proprietary lessees of the cooperative interest.

Votes allocated to a cooperative interest may be cast pursuant to a proxy duly executed by a proprietary lessee. If there is more than one proprietary lessee of a unit, each proprietary lessee of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other proprietary lessees of the unit through a duly executed proxy. A proprietary lessee may not revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section except by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice. A proxy terminates one year after its date, unless a shorter term is specified.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the cooperative be cast by lessees other than proprietary lessees of leased units: (i) the provisions of subsections A and B apply to lessees as if they were proprietary lessees; (ii) proprietary lessees who have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and (iii) lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were proprietary lessees. Proprietary lessees must also be given notice, in the manner provided in §

55.1-2140

, of all meetings at which such lessees may be entitled to vote.

All votes allocated to a cooperative interest owned by the association shall be deemed present for quorum purposes at all duly called meetings of the association and shall be deemed cast in the same proportions as the votes cast by proprietary lessees, other than the association.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-467; 2004, c. 242; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2143.
Tort and contract liability.

Neither the association nor any proprietary lessee except the declarant is liable for that declarant’s torts in connection with any part of the cooperative that that declarant has the responsibility to maintain. Otherwise, an action alleging wrongdoing by the association shall be brought against the association and not against any proprietary lessee. If such wrongdoing occurred during any period of declarant control, and the association gives the declarant reasonable notice of and an opportunity to defend against the action, the declarant who then controlled the association is liable to the association or to any proprietary lessee (i) for all tort losses not covered by insurance suffered by the association or that proprietary lessee and (ii) for all costs that the association would not have incurred but for a breach of contract or other wrongful act or omission. Whenever the declarant is liable to the association under this section, the declarant is also liable for all litigation expenses, including reasonable attorney fees, incurred by the association. Any statute of limitation affecting the association’s right of action under this section is tolled until the period of declarant control terminates.

A proprietary lessee is not precluded from bringing an action contemplated by this section because he is a proprietary lessee or a member or officer of the association. Liens resulting from judgments against the association are governed by §

55.1-2151

.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-468; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2144.
Conveyance or encumbrance of the cooperative.

Part of the cooperative may be conveyed, and all or part of the cooperative may be subjected to a security interest, by the association if persons entitled to cast at least 80 percent of the votes in the association, including a simple majority of the votes allocated to cooperative interests not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to that action. If fewer than all the units or limited common elements are to be conveyed or subjected to a security interest, then all the proprietary lessees of those units, or the units to which those limited common elements are allocated, must agree in order to convey those units or limited common elements or subject them to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Proceeds of the sale are an asset of the association.

An agreement to convey a part of the cooperative or subject it to a security interest must be evidenced by the execution of an agreement, or ratifications of such an agreement, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of proprietary lessees. The agreement must specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless recorded before that date. The agreement and such ratifications must be recorded in every county or city in which a portion of the cooperative is situated and is effective only upon recordation.

The association, on behalf of the proprietary lessees, may contract to convey a part of the cooperative or subject it to a security interest, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved pursuant to subsections A and B. After such approval, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance including the power to execute deeds or other instruments.

Any purported conveyance, encumbrance, or other voluntary transfer of the cooperative, unless made pursuant to this section or pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-2128

, is void.

A conveyance or encumbrance of the cooperative pursuant to this section does not deprive any unit of its rights of access and support.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-469; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.